Maine, session 132, LD590.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §163-A, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2015, c. 102, §6, is further
amended to read:
7. Committee assistance. To provide research, analysis and bill drafting assistance
for joint standing or select committees, including, but not limited to, the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs
and other legislative agencies, and to collect and assemble racial and other demographic
data from state agencies related to legislation before joint standing or select committees;